District of Columbia statutes.
31-2706

Repealed

Filing requirements of organizations of companies; unfair practices; supervision of rating organizations.

Repealed.

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 245, ch. 324, § 6
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-233, § 7, 42 DCR 24
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 39, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 9, 1997,D.C. Law 11-255, § 40, 44 DCR 1271
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(t), 44DCR 1730
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(jj), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(c), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 303, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140

D.C. Act 15-145, § 3(x) and D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(x), purported to amend subsec. (c)(5) of this section previously repealed by D.C. Law 14-213.

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: The Office of the Collector of Taxes was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Collector of Taxes including the functions of all officers, employees, and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Director, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3, dated August 28, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952, transferred the functions of the Collector of Taxes to the Finance Office. The same Order provided for the Office of the Collector of Taxes headed by a Collector in the Finance Office, and abolished the previously existing Office of the Collector of Taxes. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded and replaced by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957, which provided that the Finance Office (consisting of the Office of the Finance Officer, Property Tax Division, Revenue Division, Treasury Division, Accounting Division, and Data Processing Division) would continue under the direction and control of the Director of General Administration, and that the Treasury Division would perform the function of collecting revenues of the District of Columbia and depositing the same with the Treasurer of the United States. Organization Order No. 121, was revoked by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967, Part IVC of which prescribed the functions of the Finance Office within a newly established Department of General Administration. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions of the Finance Office as stated in Part IVC of Organization Order No. 3 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. The collection functions of the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue were transferred to the District of Columbia Treasurer by § 47-316 on March 5, 1981.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2701.

For purported temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(x) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
1973 Ed., § 35-1506.
1981 Ed., § 35-1706.